Hawaii, session 2026, HB2095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act shall be known and may be cited as the Judiciary Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2026. SECTION 2.  Act 227, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended as follows: 1. By amending part II to read: "PART II.  PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS SECTION 3.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and programs designated herein, are appropriated or authorized from the sources of funding specified to the judiciary for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.  The total expenditures and the number of permanent and temporary positions established in each fiscal year of the fiscal biennium shall not exceed the sums and the position ceilings indicated for each year, except as provided in this Act. The Judicial System 1.   JUD101 - COURTS OF APPEAL 85.00 *       85.00 * 0.48 #       0.48 # OPERATING                    JUD       9,592,659 A   [9,657,093 A] 9,962,313 A 2.   JUD310 - FIRST [JUDICIAL] CIRCUIT 1,115.50 *   [1,115.50 *] 1,117.50 * 57.58 #      [57.58 #] 55.58 # OPERATING                    JUD      98,130,866 A  [98,298,808 A] 100,189,140 A 35.00 *       35.00 * JUD       4,261,273 B   4,261,273 B 3.   JUD320 - SECOND [JUDICIAL] CIRCUIT 210.50 *      210.50 * 1.68 #       1.68 # OPERATING                    JUD      20,093,034 A  [20,093,034 A] 20,331,034 A 4.   JUD330 - THIRD [JUDICIAL] CIRCUIT 246.00 *     [246.00 *] 247.00 * 5.20 #       [5.20 #] 4.20 # OPERATING                    JUD      24,912,104 A  [24,903,209 A] 25,295,055 A 5.   JUD350 - FIFTH [JUDICIAL] CIRCUIT 103.00 *      103.00 * 2.60 #       2.60 # OPERATING                    JUD       9,159,756 A   [9,159,756 A] 9,291,556 A 6.   JUD501 - JUDICIAL SELECTION COMMISSION 1.00 *       1.00 * OPERATING                    JUD         114,074 A     114,074 A 7.   JUD601 - ADMINISTRATION 234.50 *     [234.50 *] 235.50 * 8.48 #       8.48 # OPERATING                    JUD      39,723,183 A  [37,353,371 A] 40,842,308 A 1.00 *       [1.00 *] 0.00 * 9.00 #       9.00 # JUD       8,241,219 B   8,241,219 B JUD         343,261 W     343,261 W INVESTMENT CAPITAL             JUD      12,900,000 C   55,400,000 C" 2. By amending parts IV and V to read: "PART IV.  CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS SECTION 8.  The sum of [$12,900,000] $68,300,000 appropriated or authorized in part II of this Act for capital improvement projects shall be expended by the judiciary for the projects listed below; provided that several related or similar projects may be combined into a single project, if a combination is advantageous or convenient for implementation; provided further that the total cost of the projects thus combined shall not exceed the total of the sums specified for the projects separately.  The amount after each cost element and the total funding for each project listed in this part are in thousands of dollars. A. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT JUD601 - ADMINISTRATION 1.        KAUAI JUDICIARY COMPLEX CHILLER REPLACEMENT, KAUAI PLANS, CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE REPLACEMENT OF A KAUAI JUDICIARY COMPLEX CHILLER UNIT. TOTAL FUNDING           JUD            900 C         C [2.       LUMP SUM CIP FOR JUDICIARY FACILITIES, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR GENERAL ALTERATIONS, UPGRADES, AND IMPROVEMENTS TO JUDICIARY FACILITIES, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING           JUD          8,000 C         C 3.        SOUTH KOHALA DISTRICT COURTHOUSE, HAWAII ISLAND PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A NEW SOUTH KOHALA DISTRICT COURTHOUSE. TOTAL FUNDING           JUD          4,000 C        C] 1.1.      KAUAI JUDICIARY COMPLEX, A/C CHILLER, KAUAI EQUIPMENT FOR A/C CHILLER REPLACEMENT AT KAUAI JUDICIARY COMPLEX, KAUAI. TOTAL FUNDING           JUD               C    1,200 C 2.        LUMP SUM CIP FOR JUDICIARY FACILITIES, STATEWIDE LAND, PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR GENERAL ALTERATIONS, UPGRADES, AND IMPROVEMENTS TO JUDICIARY FACILITIES, STATEWIDE. LAND                                             100 PLANS                                          1,000 DESIGN                                          1,500 CONSTRUCTION                                     2,400 EQUIPMENT                                       3,000 TOTAL FUNDING           JUD          8,000 C    8,000 C 3.        SOUTH KOHALA DISTRICT COURT, HAWAII ISLAND PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A NEW FACILITY FOR THE NEW SOUTH KOHALA DISTRICT COURT, HAWAII. TOTAL FUNDING           JUD          4,000 C    30,000 C 4.        HALE KAULIKE, A/C CHILLER, HAWAII ISLAND EQUIPMENT FOR A/C CHILLER REPLACEMENT AT HALE KAULIKE, HAWAII ISLAND. TOTAL FUNDING           JUD               C    1,200 C 5.        KAAHUMANU HALE ELEVATOR SYSTEMS UPGRADES AND MODERNIZATION, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ELEVATOR SYSTEMS UPGRADES AND MODERNIZATION, OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING           JUD               C    15,000 C PART V.  ISSUANCE OF BONDS SECTION 9.  General obligation bonds may be issued, as provided by law, to yield the amount that may be necessary to finance projects authorized in part II and listed in part IV of this Act; provided that the sum total of the general obligation bonds so issued shall not exceed [$12,900,000.] $68,300,000." SECTION 3.  If any portion of this Act or its application to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid for any reason, the remainder of the Act and any provision thereof shall not be affected.  If any portion of a specific appropriation is held to be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall be independent of the invalid portion and shall be expended to fulfill the objective and intent of the appropriation to the extent possible. SECTION 4.  If any manifest clerical, typographical, or other mechanical error is found in this Act, the chief justice may correct the error.  All changes made pursuant to this section shall be reported to the legislature at its next regular session. SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request